Illinois, session 104th, SB1756.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Interstate Massage Compact Act. 6    Section 5. Interstate Massage Compact. The State of 7Illinois enters into the Interstate Massage Compact in 8substantially the following form with all other states joining 9the Compact: 10    INTERSTATE MASSAGE COMPACT 11    ARTICLE 1-PURPOSE 12    The purpose of this Compact is to reduce the burdens on 13State governments and to facilitate the interstate practice 14and regulation of Massage Therapy with the goal of improving 15public access to, and the safety of, Massage Therapy Services. 16Through this Compact, the Member States seek to establish a 17regulatory framework which provides for a new multistate 18licensing program. Through this additional licensing pathway, 19the Member States seek to provide increased value and mobility 20to licensed massage therapists in the Member States, while   SB1756- 2 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1ensuring the provision of safe, competent, and reliable 2services to the public.3    This Compact is designed to achieve the following 4objectives, and the Member States hereby ratify the same 5intentions by subscribing hereto:6        A. Increase public access to Massage Therapy Services 7    by providing for a multistate licensing pathway;8        B. Enhance the Member States' ability to protect the 9    public's health and safety;10        C. Enhance the Member States' ability to prevent human 11    trafficking and licensure fraud;12        D. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in 13    regulating the multistate Practice of Massage Therapy;14        E. Support relocating military members and their 15    spouses;16        F. Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure, 17    investigative, and disciplinary information between the 18    Member States;19        G. Create an Interstate Commission that will exist to 20    implement and administer the Compact;21        H. Allow a Member State to hold a Licensee 22    accountable, even where that Licensee holds a Multistate 23    License;24        I. Create a streamlined pathway for Licensees to 25    practice in Member States, thus increasing the mobility of 26    duly licensed massage therapists; and  SB1756- 3 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1        J. Serve the needs of licensed massage therapists and 2    the public receiving their services; however,3        K. Nothing in this Compact is intended to prevent a 4    State from enforcing its own laws regarding the Practice 5    of Massage Therapy. 6    ARTICLE 2-DEFINITIONS 7    As used in this Compact, except as otherwise provided and 8subject to clarification by the Rules of the Commission, the 9following definitions shall govern the terms herein:10    A. "Active Military Member" - any person with full-time 11duty status in the armed forces of the United States, 12including members of the National Guard and Reserve.13    B. "Adverse Action" - any administrative, civil, 14equitable, or criminal action permitted by a Member State's 15laws which is imposed by a Licensing Authority or other 16regulatory body against a Licensee, including actions against 17an individual's Authorization to Practice such as revocation, 18suspension, probation, surrender in lieu of discipline, 19monitoring of the Licensee, limitation of the Licensee's 20practice, or any other Encumbrance on licensure affecting an 21individual's ability to practice Massage Therapy, including 22the issuance of a cease and desist order.23    C. "Alternative Program" - a non-disciplinary monitoring 24or prosecutorial diversion program approved by a Member   SB1756- 4 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1State's Licensing Authority.2    D. "Authorization to Practice" - a legal authorization by 3a Remote State pursuant to a Multistate License permitting the 4Practice of Massage Therapy in that Remote State, which shall 5be subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the Licensing 6Authority in that Remote State.7    E. "Background Check" - the submission of an applicant's 8criminal history record information, as further defined in 28 9C.F.R. § 20.3(d), as amended from the Federal Bureau of 10Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining State 11criminal records in the applicant's Home State.12    F. "Charter Member States" - Member States who have 13enacted legislation to adopt this Compact where such 14legislation predates the effective date of this Compact as 15defined in Article 12.16    G. "Commission" - the government agency whose membership 17consists of all States that have enacted this Compact, which 18is known as the Interstate Massage Compact Commission, as 19defined in Article 8, and which shall operate as an 20instrumentality of the Member States.21    H. "Continuing Competence" - a requirement, as a condition 22of license renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, 23and completion of, educational or professional activities that 24maintain, improve, or enhance Massage Therapy fitness to 25practice.26    I. "Current Significant Investigative Information" -   SB1756- 5 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1Investigative Information that a Licensing Authority, after an 2inquiry or investigation that complies with a Member State's 3due process requirements, has reason to believe is not 4groundless and, if proved true, would indicate a violation of 5that State's laws regarding the Practice of Massage Therapy.6    J. "Data System" - a repository of information about 7Licensees who hold Multistate Licenses, which may include but 8is not limited to license status, Investigative Information, 9and Adverse Actions.10    K. "Disqualifying Event" - any event which shall 11disqualify an individual from holding a Multistate License 12under this Compact, which the Commission may by Rule specify.13    L. "Encumbrance" - a revocation or suspension of, or any 14limitation or condition on, the full and unrestricted Practice 15of Massage Therapy by a Licensing Authority.16    M. "Executive Committee" - a group of delegates elected or 17appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to 18them by, the Commission.19    N. "Home State" - means the Member State which is a 20Licensee's primary state of residence where the Licensee holds 21an active Single-State License.22    O. "Investigative Information" - information, records, or 23documents received or generated by a Licensing Authority 24pursuant to an investigation or other inquiry.25    P. "Licensing Authority" - a State's regulatory body 26responsible for issuing Massage Therapy licenses or otherwise   SB1756- 6 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1overseeing the Practice of Massage Therapy in that State.2    Q. "Licensee" - an individual who currently holds a 3license from a Member State to fully practice Massage Therapy, 4whose license is not a student, provisional, temporary, 5inactive, or other similar status.6    R. "Massage Therapy", "Massage Therapy Services", and the 7"Practice of Massage Therapy" - the care and services provided 8by a Licensee as set forth in the Member State's statutes and 9regulations in the State where the services are being 10provided.11    S. "Member State" - any State that has adopted this 12Compact.13    T. "Multistate License" - a license that consists of 14Authorizations to Practice Massage Therapy in all Remote 15States pursuant to this Compact, which shall be subject to the 16enforcement jurisdiction of the Licensing Authority in a 17Licensee's Home State.18    U. "National Licensing Examination" - A national 19examination developed by a national association of Massage 20Therapy regulatory boards, as defined by Commission Rule, that 21is derived from a practice analysis and is consistent with 22generally accepted psychometric principles of fairness, 23validity and reliability, and is administered under secure and 24confidential examination protocols.25    V. "Remote State" - any Member State, other than the 26Licensee's Home State.  SB1756- 7 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    W. "Rule" - any opinion or regulation promulgated by the 2Commission under this Compact, which shall have the force of 3law.4    X. "Single-State License" - a current, valid authorization 5issued by a Member State's Licensing Authority allowing an 6individual to fully practice Massage Therapy, that is not a 7restricted,student, provisional, temporary, or inactive 8practice authorization and authorizes practice only within the 9issuing State.10    Y. "State" - a state, territory, possession of the United 11States, or the District of Columbia. 12    ARTICLE 3-MEMBER STATE REQUIREMENTS 13    A. To be eligible to join this Compact, and to maintain 14eligibility as a Member State, a State must:15        1. License and regulate the Practice of Massage 16    Therapy;17        2. Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and 18    investigate complaints from the public, regulatory or law 19    enforcement agencies, or the Commission about Licensees 20    practicing in that State;21        3. Accept passage of a National Licensing Examination 22    as a criterion for Massage Therapy licensure in that 23    State;24        4. Require that Licensees satisfy educational   SB1756- 8 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    requirements prior to being licensed to provide Massage 2    Therapy Services to the public in that State;3        5. Implement procedures for requiring the Background 4    Check of applicants for a Multistate License, and for the 5    reporting of any Disqualifying Events, including but not 6    limited to obtaining and submitting, for each Licensee 7    holding a Multistate License and each applicant for a 8    Multistate License, fingerprint or other biometric-based 9    information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 10    Background Checks; receiving the results of the Federal 11    Bureau of Investigation record search on Background Checks 12    and considering the results of such a Background Check in 13    making licensure decisions;14        6. Have Continuing Competence requirements as a 15    condition for license renewal;16        7. Participate in the Data System, including through 17    the use of unique identifying numbers as described herein;18        8. Notify the Commission and other Member States, in 19    compliance with the terms of the Compact and Rules of the 20    Commission, of any disciplinary action taken by the State 21    against a Licensee practicing under a Multistate License 22    in that State, or of the existence of Investigative 23    Information or Current Significant Investigative 24    Information regarding a Licensee practicing in that State 25    pursuant to a Multistate License;26        9. Comply with the Rules of the Commission;  SB1756- 9 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1        10. Accept Licensees with valid Multistate Licenses 2    from other Member States as established herein;3    B. Individuals not residing in a Member State shall 4continue to be able to apply for a Member State's Single-State 5License as provided under the laws of each Member State. 6However, the Single-State License granted to those individuals 7shall not be recognized as granting a Multistate License for 8Massage Therapy in any other Member State;9    C. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements 10established by a Member State for the issuance of a 11Single-State License; and12    D. A Multistate License issued to a Licensee shall be 13recognized by each Remote State as an Authorization to 14Practice Massage Therapy in each Remote State. 15    ARTICLE 4-MULTISTATE LICENSE REQUIREMENTS 16    A. To qualify for a Multistate License under this Compact, 17and to maintain eligibility for such a license, an applicant 18must:19        1. Hold an active Single-State License to practice 20    Massage Therapy in the applicant's Home State;21        2. Have completed at least six hundred and twenty-five 22    (625) clock hours of Massage Therapy education or the 23    substantial equivalent which the Commission may approve by 24    Rule.  SB1756- 10 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1        3. Have passed a National Licensing Examination or the 2    substantial equivalent which the Commission may approve by 3    Rule.4        4. Submit to a Background Check;5        5. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have 6    entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense 7    under applicable State or federal criminal law, within 8    five (5) years prior to the date of their application, 9    where such a time period shall not include any time served 10    for the offense, and provided that the applicant has 11    completed any and all requirements arising as a result of 12    any such offense;13        6. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have 14    entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor 15    offense related to the Practice of Massage Therapy under 16    applicable State or federal criminal law, within two (2) 17    years prior to the date of their application where such a 18    time period shall not include any time served for the 19    offense, and provided that the applicant has completed any 20    and all requirements arising as a result of any such 21    offense;22        7. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have 23    entered into an agreed disposition, of any offense, 24    whether a misdemeanor or a felony, under State or federal 25    law, at any time, relating to any of the following:26            a. Kidnapping;  SB1756- 11 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1            b. Human trafficking;2            c. Human smuggling;3            d. Sexual battery, sexual assault, or any related 4        offenses; or5            e. Any other category of offense which the 6        Commission may by Rule designate.7        8. Have not previously held a Massage Therapy license 8    which was revoked by, or surrendered in lieu of discipline 9    to an applicable Licensing Authority;10        9. Have no history of any Adverse Action on any 11    occupational or professional license within two (2) years 12    prior to the date of their application; and13        10. Pay all required fees.14    B. A Multistate License granted pursuant to this Compact 15may be effective for a definite period of time concurrent with 16the renewal of the Home State license.17    C. A Licensee practicing in a Member State is subject to 18all scope of practice laws governing Massage Therapy Services 19in that State.20    D. The Practice of Massage Therapy under a Multistate 21License granted pursuant to this Compact will subject the 22Licensee to the jurisdiction of the Licensing Authority, the 23courts, and the laws of the Member State in which the Massage 24Therapy Services are provided. 25    ARTICLE 5-AUTHORITY OF INTERSTATE MASSAGE COMPACT   SB1756- 12 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1COMMISSION AND MEMBER STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES 2    A. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the 3Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any 4way reduce the ability of a Member State to enact and enforce 5laws, regulations, or other rules related to the Practice of 6Massage Therapy in that State, where those laws, regulations, 7or other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of 8this Compact.9    B. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the 10Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any 11way reduce the ability of a Member State to take Adverse Action 12against a Licensee's Single-State License to practice Massage 13Therapy in that State.14    C. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the 15Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any 16way reduce the ability of a Remote State to take Adverse Action 17against a Licensee's Authorization to Practice in that State.18    D. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the 19Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any 20way reduce the ability of a Licensee's Home State to take 21Adverse Action against a Licensee's Multistate License based 22upon information provided by a Remote State.23    E. Insofar as practical, a Member State's Licensing 24Authority shall cooperate with the Commission and with each 25entity exercising independent regulatory authority over the   SB1756- 13 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1Practice of Massage Therapy according to the provisions of 2this Compact. 3    ARTICLE 6-ADVERSE ACTIONS 4    A. A Licensee's Home State shall have exclusive power to 5impose an Adverse Action against a Licensee's Multistate 6License issued by the Home State.7    B. A Home State may take Adverse Action on a Multistate 8License based on the Investigative Information, Current 9Significant Investigative Information, or Adverse Action of a 10Remote State.11    C. A Home State shall retain authority to complete any 12pending investigations of a Licensee practicing under a 13Multistate License who changes their Home State during the 14course of such an investigation. The Licensing Authority shall 15also be empowered to report the results of such an 16investigation to the Commission through the Data System as 17described herein.18    D. Any Member State may investigate actual or alleged 19violations of the scope of practice laws in any other Member 20State for a massage therapist who holds a Multistate License.21    E. A Remote State shall have the authority to:22        1. Take Adverse Actions against a Licensee's 23    Authorization to Practice;24        2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an   SB1756- 14 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    Encumbrance on a Licensee's Authorization to Practice in 2    that State.3        3. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and 4    investigations that require the attendance and testimony 5    of witnesses, as well as the production of evidence. 6    Subpoenas issued by a Licensing Authority in a Member 7    State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the 8    production of evidence from another Member State shall be 9    enforced in the latter State by any court of competent 10    jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of 11    that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings 12    before it. The issuing Licensing Authority shall pay any 13    witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees 14    required by the service statutes of the State in which the 15    witnesses or evidence are located.16        4. If otherwise permitted by State law, recover from 17    the affected Licensee the costs of investigations and 18    disposition of cases resulting from any Adverse Action 19    taken against that Licensee.20        5. Take Adverse Action against the Licensee's 21    Authorization to Practice in that State based on the 22    factual findings of another Member State.23    F. If an Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against 24a Licensee's Multistate License or Single-State License to 25practice in the Home State, the Licensee's Authorization to 26Practice in all other Member States shall be deactivated until   SB1756- 15 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1all Encumbrances have been removed from such license. All Home 2State disciplinary orders that impose an Adverse Action 3against a Licensee shall include a statement that the Massage 4Therapist's Authorization to Practice is deactivated in all 5Member States during the pendency of the order.6    G. If Adverse Action is taken by a Remote State against a 7Licensee's Authorization to Practice, that Adverse Action 8applies to all Authorizations to Practice in all Remote 9States. A Licensee whose Authorization to Practice in a Remote 10State is removed for a specified period of time is not eligible 11to apply for a new Multistate License in any other State until 12the specific time for removal of the Authorization to Practice 13has passed and all encumbrance requirements are satisfied.14    H. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's 15authority to accept a Licensee's participation in an 16Alternative Program in lieu of Adverse Action. A Licensee's 17Multistate License shall be suspended for the duration of the 18Licensee's participation in any Alternative Program.19    I. Joint Investigations20        1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member 21    State by its respective scope of practice laws or other 22    applicable State law, a Member State may participate with 23    other Member States in joint investigations of Licensees.24        2. Member States shall share any investigative, 25    litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any 26    joint or individual investigation initiated under the   SB1756- 16 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    Compact. 2    ARTICLE 7-ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER AND THEIR SPOUSES 3    Active Military Member, or their spouses, shall designate 4a Home State where the individual has a current license to 5practice Massage Therapy in good standing. The individual may 6retain their Home State designation during any period of 7service when that individual or their spouse is on active duty 8assignment. 9    ARTICLE 8-ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF INTERSTATE 10MASSAGE COMPACT COMMISSION 11    A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a 12joint government agency whose membership consists of all 13Member States that have enacted the Compact known as the 14Interstate Massage Compact Commission. The Commission is an 15instrumentality of the Compact States acting jointly and not 16an instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come 17into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as 18set forth in Article 12.19    B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings20        1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one 21    (1) delegate selected by that Member State's State 22    Licensing Authority.  SB1756- 17 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1        2. The delegate shall be the primary administrative 2    officer of the State Licensing Authority or their 3    designee.4        3. The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a 5    term of office for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw 6    establish term limits.7        4. The Commission may recommend removal or suspension 8    of any delegate from office.9        5. A Member State's State Licensing Authority shall 10    fill any vacancy of its delegate occurring on the 11    Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.12        6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all 13    matters that are voted on by the Commission.14        7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each 15    calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set 16    forth in the bylaws. The Commission may meet by 17    telecommunication, video conference or other similar 18    electronic means.19    C. The Commission shall have the following powers:20        1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;21        2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest 22    policies;23        3. Adopt Rules and bylaws;24        4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with 25    the bylaws;26        5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with   SB1756- 18 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    the provisions of this Compact, the Commission's Rules, 2    and the bylaws;3        6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions 4    in the name of the Commission, provided that the standing 5    of any State Licensing Authority to sue or be sued under 6    applicable law shall not be affected;7        7. Maintain and certify records and information 8    provided to a Member State as the authenticated business 9    records of the Commission, and designate an agent to do so 10    on the Commission's behalf;11        8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;12        9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of 13    personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a 14    Member State;15        10. Conduct an annual financial review;16        11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix 17    compensation, define duties, grant such individuals 18    appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the 19    Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel policies 20    and programs relating to conflicts of interest, 21    qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel 22    matters;23        12. Assess and collect fees;24        13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, 25    grants of money, other sources of revenue, equipment, 26    supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize,   SB1756- 19 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the 2    Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or 3    conflict of interest;4        14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or 5    use any property, real, personal, or mixed, or any 6    undivided interest therein;7        15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 8    abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, 9    personal, or mixed;10        16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;11        17. Borrow money;12        18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, 13    composed of members, State regulators, State legislators 14    or their representatives, and consumer representatives, 15    and such other interested persons as may be designated in 16    this Compact and the bylaws;17        19. Accept and transmit complaints from the public, 18    regulatory or law enforcement agencies, or the Commission, 19    to the relevant Member State(s) regarding potential 20    misconduct of Licensees;21        20. Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer 22    and such other officers of the Commission as provided in 23    the Commission's bylaws;24        21. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, 25    including a chair and a vice chair;26        22. Adopt and provide to the Member States an annual   SB1756- 20 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    report.2        23. Determine whether a State's adopted language is 3    materially different from the model Compact language such 4    that the State would not qualify for participation in the 5    Compact; and6        24. Perform such other functions as may be necessary 7    or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact.8    D. The Executive Committee9        1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act 10    on behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this 11    Compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the 12    Executive Committee shall include:13            a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the 14        administration of the Compact including compliance 15        with the provisions of the Compact, the Commission's 16        Rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed 17        necessary;18            b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the 19        Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, 20        fees charged to Compact Member States, fees charged to 21        Licensees, and other fees;22            c. Ensuring Compact administration services are 23        appropriately provided, including by contract;24            d. Preparing and recommending the budget;25            e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the 26        Commission;  SB1756- 21 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1            f. Monitoring Compact compliance of Member States 2        and providing compliance reports to the Commission;3            g. Establishing additional committees as 4        necessary;5            h. Exercise the powers and duties of the 6        Commission during the interim between Commission 7        meetings, except for adopting or amending Rules, 8        adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other 9        powers and duties expressly reserved to the Commission 10        by Rule or bylaw; and11            i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws 12        of the Commission.13        2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of seven 14    voting members and up to two ex-officio members as 15    follows:16            a. The chair and vice chair of the Commission and 17        any other members of the Commission who serve on the 18        Executive Committee shall be voting members of the 19        Executive Committee; and20            b. Other than the chair, vice-chair, secretary and 21        treasurer, the Commission shall elect three voting 22        members from the current membership of the Commission.23            c. The Commission may elect ex-officio, nonvoting 24        members as necessary as follows:25                i. One ex-officio member who is a 26            representative of the national association of   SB1756- 22 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1            State Massage Therapy regulatory boards2                ii. One ex-officio member as specified in the 3            Commission's bylaws.4        3. The Commission may remove any member of the 5    Executive Committee as provided in the Commission's 6    bylaws.7        4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least 8    annually.9            a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to 10        the public, except that the Executive Committee may 11        meet in a closed, non-public session of a public 12        meeting when dealing with any of the matters covered 13        under subsection F.4.14            b. The Executive Committee shall give five 15        business days advance notice of its public meetings, 16        posted on its website and as determined to provide 17        notice to persons with an interest in the public 18        matters the Executive Committee intends to address at 19        those meetings.20        5. The Executive Committee may hold an emergency 21    meeting when acting for the Commission to:22            a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, 23        safety, or welfare;24            b. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating 25        State funds; or26            c. Protect public health and safety.  SB1756- 23 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member 2States an annual report.3    F. Meetings of the Commission4        1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed 5    pursuant to this subsection shall be open to the public. 6    Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the 7    Commission's website at least thirty (30) days prior to 8    the public meeting.9        2. Notwithstanding subsection F.1 of this Article, the 10    Commission may convene an emergency public meeting by 11    providing at least twenty-four (24) hours prior notice on 12    the Commission's website, and any other means as provided 13    in the Commission's Rules, for any of the reasons it may 14    dispense with notice of proposed rulemaking under Article 15    10.L. The Commission's legal counsel shall certify the 16    that one of the reasons justifying an emergency public 17    meeting has been met.18        3. Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the 19    time, date, and location of the meeting, and if the 20    meeting is to be held or accessible via telecommunication, 21    video conference, or other electronic means, the notice 22    shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting.23        4. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public 24    meeting for the Commission to discuss:25            a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its 26        obligations under the Compact;  SB1756- 24 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1            b. The employment, compensation, discipline or 2        other matters, practices or procedures related to 3        specific employees or other matters related to the 4        Commission's internal personnel practices and 5        procedures;6            c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee 7        by the Commission or by a Member State's Licensing 8        Authority;9            d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated 10        litigation;11            e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, 12        lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate;13            f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally 14        censuring any person;15            g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial 16        information that is privileged or confidential;17            h. Information of a personal nature where 18        disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted 19        invasion of personal privacy;20            i. Investigative records compiled for law 21        enforcement purposes;22            j. Information related to any investigative 23        reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the 24        Commission or other committee charged with 25        responsibility of investigation or determination of 26        compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;  SB1756- 25 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1            k. Legal advice;2            l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure 3        to the public by federal or Member State law; or4            m. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission 5        by Rule.6    If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the 7presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed 8and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such 9reference shall be recorded in the minutes.10    The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly 11describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide 12a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons 13therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All 14documents considered in connection with an action shall be 15identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a 16closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release 17only by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a court 18of competent jurisdiction.19    G. Financing of the Commission20        1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the 21    payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, 22    organization, and ongoing activities.23        2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate 24    sources of revenue, donations, and grants of money, 25    equipment, supplies, materials, and services.26        3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual   SB1756- 26 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    assessment from each Member State and impose fees on 2    Licensees of Member States to whom it grants a Multistate 3    License to cover the cost of the operations and activities 4    of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total 5    amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved 6    each year for which revenue is not provided by other 7    sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Member 8    States shall be allocated based upon a formula that the 9    Commission shall promulgate by Rule.10        4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any 11    kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the 12    same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any 13    Member States, except by and with the authority of the 14    Member State.15        5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 16    receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements 17    of the Commission shall be subject to the financial review 18    and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. 19    All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the 20    Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review 21    by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the 22    report of the financial review shall be included in and 23    become part of the annual report of the Commission.24    H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification25        1. The members, officers, executive director, 26    employees and representatives of the Commission shall be   SB1756- 27 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    immune from suit and liability, both personally and in 2    their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or 3    loss of property or personal injury or other civil 4    liability caused by or arising out of any actual or 5    alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the 6    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 7    basis for believing occurred within the scope of 8    Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; 9    provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed 10    to protect any such person from suit or liability for any 11    damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the 12    intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that 13    person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the 14    Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the 15    immunity granted hereunder.16        2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, 17    executive director, employee, and representative of the 18    Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability 19    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or 20    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 21    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined 22    by the Commission that the person against whom the claim 23    is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 24    within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or 25    responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be 26    construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own   SB1756- 28 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that 2    the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not 3    result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton 4    misconduct.5        3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless 6    any member, officer, executive director, employee, and 7    representative of the Commission for the amount of any 8    settlement or judgment obtained against that person 9    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or 10    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 11    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such 12    person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 13    within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or 14    responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 15    error, or omission did not result from the intentional or 16    willful or wanton misconduct of that person.17        4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation 18    on the liability of any Licensee for professional 19    malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely 20    by any other applicable State laws.21        5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to 22    waive or otherwise abrogate a Member State's State action 23    immunity or State action affirmative defense with respect 24    to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or 25    any other State or federal antitrust or anticompetitive 26    law or regulation.  SB1756- 29 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1        6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a 2    waiver of sovereign immunity by the Member States or by 3    the Commission. 4    ARTICLE 9-DATA SYSTEM 5    A. The Commission shall provide for the development, 6maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated 7database and reporting system.8    B. The Commission shall assign each applicant for a 9Multistate License a unique identifier, as determined by the 10Rules of the Commission.11    C. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the 12contrary, a Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the 13Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is 14applicable as required by the Rules of the Commission, 15including:16        1. Identifying information;17        2. Licensure data;18        3. Adverse Actions against a license and information 19    related thereto;20        4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative 21    Program participation, the beginning and ending dates of 22    such participation, and other information related to such 23    participation;24        5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the   SB1756- 30 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    reason(s) for such denial (excluding the reporting of any 2    criminal history record information where prohibited by 3    law);4        6. The existence of Investigative Information;5        7. The existence presence of Current Significant 6    Investigative Information; and7        8. Other information that may facilitate the 8    administration of this Compact or the protection of the 9    public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.10    D. The records and information provided to a Member State 11pursuant to this Compact or through the Data System, when 12certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall 13constitute the authenticated business records of the 14Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay 15exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or 16administrative proceedings in a Member State.17    E. The existence of Current Significant Investigative 18Information and the existence of Investigative Information 19pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State will only be 20available to other Member States.21    F. It is the responsibility of the Member States to report 22any Adverse Action against a Licensee who holds a Multistate 23License and to monitor the database to determine whether 24Adverse Action has been taken against such a Licensee or 25License applicant. Adverse Action information pertaining to a 26Licensee or License applicant in any Member State will be   SB1756- 31 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1available to any other Member State.2    G. Member States contributing information to the Data 3System may designate information that may not be shared with 4the public without the express permission of the contributing 5State.6    H. Any information submitted to the Data System that is 7subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of 8the Member State contributing the information shall be removed 9from the Data System. 10    ARTICLE 10-RULEMAKING 11    A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in 12order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer 13the purposes and provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be 14invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of 15competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because 16the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner 17that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the 18powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable 19standard of review.20    B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law 21in each Member State, provided however that where the Rules of 22the Commission conflict with the laws of the Member State that 23establish the Member State's scope of practice as held by a 24court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission   SB1756- 32 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the 2conflict.3    C. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers 4pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article and the 5Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding as of the 6date specified by the Commission for each Rule.7    D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States 8rejects a Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of a statute 9or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact 10within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then 11such Rule shall have no further force and effect in any Member 12State or to any State applying to participate in the Compact.13    E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting 14of the Commission.15    F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission 16shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral 17and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.18    G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, 19and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at 20which the Commission will hold a public hearing on the 21proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide a Notice of 22Proposed Rulemaking:23        1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly 24    accessible platform;25        2. To persons who have requested notice of the 26    Commission's notices of proposed rulemaking, and  SB1756- 33 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1        3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule 2    specify.3    H. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:4        1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing 5    at which the Commission will hear public comments on the 6    proposed Rule and, if different, the time, date, and 7    location of the meeting where the Commission will consider 8    and vote on the proposed Rule;9        2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video 10    conference, or other electronic means, the Commission 11    shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing in 12    the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking;13        3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason 14    therefor;15        4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from 16    any interested person; and17        5. The manner in which interested persons may submit 18    written comments.19    I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording 20and all written comments and documents received by the 21Commission in response to the proposed Rule shall be available 22to the public.23    J. Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring 24a separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the 25convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this 26article.  SB1756- 34 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all 2Commissioners, take final action on the proposed Rule based on 3the Rulemaking record.4        1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed 5    Rule provided the changes do not enlarge the original 6    purpose of the proposed Rule.7        2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the 8    reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule 9    as well as reasons for substantive changes not made that 10    were recommended by commenters.11        3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable 12    effective date for the Rule. Except for an emergency as 13    provided in subsection L, the effective date of the Rule 14    shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after the 15    Commission issuing the notice that it adopted or amended 16    the Rule.17    L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the 18Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 24 19hours notice, provided that the usual Rulemaking procedures 20provided in the Compact and in this article shall be 21retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably 22possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the 23effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this 24provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted 25immediately to:26        1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety,   SB1756- 35 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    or welfare;2        2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;3        3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that 4    is established by federal law or rule; or5        4. Protect public health and safety.6    M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the 7Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule 8for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in 9format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public 10notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the 11Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any 12person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The 13revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision 14results in a material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be 15made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the 16end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision 17will take effect without further action. If the revision is 18challenged, the revision may not take effect without the 19approval of the Commission.20    N. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall apply 21under this Compact. 22    ARTICLE 11-OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT 23    A. Oversight24        1. The executive and judicial branches of State   SB1756- 36 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    government in each Member State shall enforce this Compact 2    and take all actions necessary and appropriate to 3    implement the Compact.4        2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or 5    against the Commission shall be brought solely and 6    exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the 7    principal office of the Commission is located. The 8    Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to 9    the extent it adopts or consents to participate in 10    alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein 11    shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue 12    in any action against a Licensee for professional 13    malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter.14        3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service 15    of process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or 16    interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to 17    intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure 18    to provide the Commission service of process shall render 19    a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this 20    Compact, or promulgated Rules.21    B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination22        1. If the Commission determines that a Member State 23    has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 24    responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated 25    Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the 26    defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe the   SB1756- 37 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any 2    other action that the Commission may take, and shall offer 3    training and specific technical assistance regarding the 4    default.5        2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice 6    of default to the other Member States.7    C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the 8defaulting State may be terminated from the Compact upon an 9affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the Member 10States, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on 11that State by this Compact may be terminated on the effective 12date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the 13offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during 14the period of default.15    D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be 16imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have 17been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall 18be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and 19minority leaders of the defaulting State's legislature, the 20defaulting State's State Licensing Authority and each of the 21Member States' State Licensing Authority.22    E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all 23assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the 24effective date of termination, including obligations that 25extend beyond the effective date of termination.26    F. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this   SB1756- 38 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1Compact, that State shall immediately provide notice to all 2Licensees who hold a Multistate License within that State of 3such termination. The terminated State shall continue to 4recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a 5minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of said 6notice of termination.7    G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a 8State that is found to be in default or that has been 9terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing 10between the Commission and the defaulting State.11    H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the 12Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the 13District of Columbia or the federal district where the 14Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party 15shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including 16reasonable attorney's fees.17    I. Dispute Resolution18        1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission 19    shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact 20    that arise among Member States and between Member and 21    non-Member States.22        2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing 23    for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for 24    disputes as appropriate.25    J. Enforcement26        1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its   SB1756- 39 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    discretion, shall enforce the provisions of this Compact 2    and the Commission's Rules.3        2. By majority vote as provided by Commission Rule, 4    the Commission may initiate legal action against a Member 5    State in default in the United States District Court for 6    the District of Columbia or the federal district where the 7    Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance 8    with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated 9    Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive 10    relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is 11    necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs 12    of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. 13    The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of 14    the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other 15    remedies available under federal or the defaulting Member 16    State's law.17        3. A Member State may initiate legal action against 18    the Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District 19    of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission 20    has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the 21    provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The 22    relief sought may include both injunctive relief and 23    damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, 24    the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such 25    litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.26        4. No individual or entity other than a Member State   SB1756- 40 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    may enforce this Compact against the Commission. 2    ARTICLE 12-EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT 3    A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which 4the Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member 5State.6        1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the 7    Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each 8    of the Charter Member States to determine if the statute 9    enacted by each such Charter Member State is materially 10    different than the model Compact statute.11            a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found 12        to be materially different from the model Compact 13        statute shall be entitled to the default process set 14        forth in Article 11.15            b. If any Member State is later found to be in 16        default, or is terminated or withdraws from the 17        Compact, the Commission shall remain in existence and 18        the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number 19        of Member States should be less than seven (7).20        2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to 21    the Charter Member States shall be subject to the process 22    set forth in Article 8.C.23 to determine if their 23    enactments are materially different from the model Compact 24    statute and whether they qualify for participation in the   SB1756- 41 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    Compact.2        3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission 3    or in furtherance of the purposes of the administration of 4    the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact or 5    the Commission coming into existence shall be considered 6    to be actions of the Commission unless specifically 7    repudiated by the Commission.8        4. Any State that joins the Compact shall be subject 9    to the Commission's Rules and bylaws as they exist on the 10    date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any 11    Rule that has been previously adopted by the Commission 12    shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the 13    Compact becomes law in that State.14    B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by 15enacting a statute repealing that State's enactment of the 16Compact.17        1. A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect 18    until one hundred eighty (180) days after enactment of the 19    repealing statute.20        2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing 21    requirement of the withdrawing State's Licensing Authority 22    to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action 23    reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the 24    effective date of withdrawal.25        3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from 26    this Compact, a State shall immediately provide notice of   SB1756- 42 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State. 2    Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the 3    contrary, such withdrawing State shall continue to 4    recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact 5    for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such notice of 6    withdrawal.7    C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to 8invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other 9cooperative arrangement between a Member State and a 10non-Member State that does not conflict with the provisions of 11this Compact.12    D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No 13amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding 14upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws of all 15Member States. 16    ARTICLE 13-CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY 17    A. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority 18shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, 19and the implementation and administration of the Compact. 20Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring 21the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the 22Commission's rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.23    B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and 24if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact   SB1756- 43 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to 2the constitution of any Member State, a State seeking 3participation in the Compact, or of the United States, or the 4applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or 5circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of 6competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this 7Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government, 8agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.9    C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this article, the 10Commission may deny a State's participation in the Compact or, 11in accordance with the requirements of Article 11.B, terminate 12a Member State's participation in the Compact, if it 13determines that a constitutional requirement of a Member State 14is a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this 15Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any 16Member State, the Compact shall remain in full force and 17effect as to the remaining Member States and in full force and 18effect as to the Member State affected as to all severable 19matters. 20    ARTICLE 14-CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE 21LAWS 22    Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of 23any other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with 24the Compact.  SB1756- 44 -LRB104 10001 RTM 20071 b1    Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal 2requirements in a Member State in conflict with the Compact 3are superseded to the extent of the conflict.4    All permissible agreements between the Commission and the 5Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.